Wyoming statutes. Title 14 Children
Article 8. Proceeding to Adjudicate Parentage

§ 14-2-801.
Proceeding authorized.

A civil proceeding may be maintained to adjudicate the parentage of a child. The proceeding is governed by the Wyoming Rules of Civil Procedure.

History.

Laws 2003, ch. 93, § 1.

Action for support civil in nature. —

Where the purpose of the proceeding is simply to compel the putative father to support his child, it is almost universally held to be a civil proceeding and governed by the rules of procedure applicable to civil actions. X v. Y, 482 P.2d 688,

1971 Wyo. LEXIS 206

(Wyo. 1971) (decided under prior law).

§ 14-2-802.
Standing to maintain proceeding.

Subject to article 5 of this act and W.S.

14-2-807

and

14-2-809

, a proceeding to adjudicate parentage may be maintained by:

The child;

The mother of the child;

A man whose paternity of the child is to be adjudicated;

The child support enforcement agency;

An authorized adoption agency or licensed child-placing agency; or

A representative authorized by law to act for an individual who would otherwise be entitled to maintain a proceeding but who is deceased, incapacitated or a minor.

History.

Laws 2003, ch. 93, § 1.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in this section, see § 14-2-402(a)(xxi).

Editor's notes. —

Most of the following annotations are taken from cases decided under prior law.

That child had presumed father did not preclude paternity petition. —

In a paternity action, while the child at issue had a presumed father, that being the mother’s husband, petitioner, who had relations with the mother as part of the parties open relationship, had standing under this section to bring a paternity action. Wyo. Stat. Ann. §

14-2-807

was a statute of limitations and did not otherwise modify the standing granted in this section. BJ v. KM, 2021 WY 37, 481 P.3d 1138,

2021 Wyo. LEXIS 44

(Wyo. 2021).

Not giving biological father same procedure to establish paternity as mother not unconstitutional. —

The failure to give the biological father the same procedure to establish paternity or nonpaternity as is given to the mother does not unconstitutionally deprive the father of due process of law nor equal protection of the law by virtue of an impermissible gender-based classification. A v. X, Y, & Z, 641 P.2d 1222,

1982 Wyo. LEXIS 307

(Wyo.), cert. denied, 459 U.S. 1021, 103 S. Ct. 388, 74 L. Ed. 2d 518, 1982 U.S. LEXIS 4426 (U.S. 1982).

No privity between mother and child. —

Since the child could have been made a party, and this section recognizes a separate action by the child, there was no privity between the mother and the child for purposes of the paternity issue in either a divorce action or a paternity action. RKS v. SDM by TY (In re SDM), 882 P.2d 1217,

1994 Wyo. LEXIS 125

(Wyo. 1994).

A child who has not been included as a party in any prior paternity case nor any prior divorce action cannot be foreclosed by the doctrines of res judicata, collateral estoppel, or judicial estoppel with respect to the child's subsequent effort to achieve determination of paternity. RKS v. SDM by TY (In re SDM), 882 P.2d 1217,

1994 Wyo. LEXIS 125

(Wyo. 1994).

At common law, biological father could not bring action for paternity.

A v. X, Y, & Z, 641 P.2d 1222,

1982 Wyo. LEXIS 307

(Wyo.), cert. denied, 459 U.S. 1021, 103 S. Ct. 388, 74 L. Ed. 2d 518, 1982 U.S. LEXIS 4426 (U.S. 1982).

Consideration of plaintiff. —

The child, the natural mother, or the presumed father can bring an action at any time to formally declare the existence of the presumed father and child relationship. JA v. CJH, 923 P.2d 758,

1996 Wyo. LEXIS 132

(Wyo. 1996).

Failure to adhere to procedural requirements. —

Although failure to adhere to the procedural requirements of the statutes governing establishment of paternity of a child receiving aid from the department of family services may cause a judgment rendered under those statutes to be void, where the defendant had notice of the hearing, an opportunity to be heard, and was accorded the process due under all the circumstances of his case, the district court did not err in entering default against the defendant, nor did it abuse its discretion in refusing the defendant relief from that default. A.P. v. Department of Health & Human Servs., Div. of Pub. Assistance & Social Servs., 849 P.2d 703,

1993 Wyo. LEXIS 52

(Wyo. 1993).

Leave to amend. —

The trial court acted within its discretion in allowing a father to file a second amended petition asserting that he was the presumptive, not putative, father in order to avoid the statute of limitations; allowing such amendment did not prejudice the mother. KC v. KM (In re IC), 941 P.2d 46,

1997 Wyo. LEXIS 96

(Wyo. 1997).

Award of costs was proper

where presumptive father improperly continued to contest paternity, and did not prevail on remand after summary judgment in his favor was reversed. TL v. CS, 975 P.2d 1065,

1999 Wyo. LEXIS 46

(Wyo. 1999).

Government agencies may pay cost. —

The former Wyoming Parentage Act contemplated department of family services (DFS) would be a party to some actions under this title. An agency could not bring an action and then claim it was not a party; since DFS was a party, former § 14-2-114 (repealed) authorized an award of attorney fees. Department of Family Servs., Div. of Pub. Assistance & Social Servs. v. DDM, 877 P.2d 259,

1994 Wyo. LEXIS 81

(Wyo. 1994).

No assumption of costs for retained counsel. —

The appointment of counsel is a condition precedent to the department's obligation to assume the cost of representation. State by Department of Family Servs. v. Jennings, 818 P.2d 1149,

1991 Wyo. LEXIS 158

(Wyo. 1991) (decided prior law).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Effect of death of child prior to institution of bastardy proceedings by mother, 7 ALR2d 1397.

Maintainability of bastardy proceeding by infant prosecutrix in own name and right, 50 ALR2d 1029.

Maintainability of bastardy proceeding against infant defendant without appointment of guardian ad litem, 69 ALR2d 1379.

Right of mentally incompetent mother to institute bastardy proceedings, 71 ALR2d 1247.

Death of putative father as precluding action for determination of paternity or for child support, 58 ALR3d 188.

Who may dispute presumption of legitimacy of child conceived or born during wedlock, 90 ALR3d 1032.

Right of indigent defendant in paternity suit to have assistance of counsel at state expense, 4 ALR4th 363.

Right of illegitimate child to maintain action to determine paternity, 86 ALR5th 637.

§ 14-2-803.
Parties to proceeding.

The following individuals shall be joined as parties in a proceeding to adjudicate parentage:

The mother of the child; and

A man whose paternity of the child is to be adjudicated.

History.

Laws 2003, ch. 93, § 1.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

Most of the following annotations are taken from cases decided under prior law.

Department of family services as party. —

An agency cannot bring an action and then claim it is not a party. Department of family services (DFS) initiated the action, participated and exercised control over the proceedings, and was a real party in interest who stood to benefit from identifying the father; just because DFS was required by statute to bring this action is irrelevant to whether the agency is a party. Department of Family Servs., Div. of Pub. Assistance & Social Servs. v. DDM, 877 P.2d 259,

1994 Wyo. LEXIS 81

(Wyo. 1994).

Decree of paternity was void

where the child was not made a party to the action nor was a guardian ad litem appointed to represent the child's best interests in the proceeding or in negotiating the agreement which the court adopted in its decree, and where the agreement was not the product of the required informal hearing or the recommendation of the court. In re TLB, 771P.2d 811,

1989 Wyo. LEXIS 98

(Wyo. 1989).

No privity between mother and child. —

Since the child could have been made a party, and former § 14-2-104 (repealed) recognized a separate action by the child, there was no privity between the mother and the child for purposes of the paternity issue in either a divorce action or a paternity action. RKS v. SDM by TY (In re SDM), 882 P.2d 1217,

1994 Wyo. LEXIS 125

(Wyo. 1994).

Law reviews. —

For article, “Attorney for Child Versus Guardian Ad Litem: Wyoming Creates a Hybrid, but is it a Formula for Malpractice?,” see XXXIV Land & Water L. Rev. 381 (1999).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Marriage of woman to one other than defendant as affecting bastardy proceeding, 98 ALR2d 256.

Necessity or propriety of appointment of independent guardian for child who is subject of paternity proceedings, 70 ALR4th 1033.

§ 14-2-804.
Personal jurisdiction.

An individual may not be adjudicated to be a parent unless the court has personal jurisdiction over the individual.

A court of this state having jurisdiction to adjudicate parentage may exercise personal jurisdiction over a nonresident individual, or the guardian or conservator of the individual, if the conditions prescribed in W.S.

20-4-142

are met.

Lack of jurisdiction over one (1) individual does not preclude the court from making an adjudication of parentage binding on another individual over whom the court has personal jurisdiction.

History.

Laws 2003, ch. 93, § 1.

Editor's notes. —

The following annotations are taken from cases decided under prior law.

No privity between mother and child. —

Since the child could have been made a party, and former § 14-2-104 (repealed) recognized a separate action by the child, there was no privity between the mother and the child for purposes of the paternity issue in either a divorce action or a paternity action. RKS v. SDM by TY (In re SDM), 882 P.2d 1217,

1994 Wyo. LEXIS 125

(Wyo. 1994).

Failure to adhere to procedural requirements. —

Although failure to adhere to the procedural requirements of the statutes governing establishment of paternity of a child receiving aid from the department of family services may cause a judgment rendered under those statutes to be void, where the defendant had notice of the hearing, an opportunity to be heard, and was accorded the process due under all the circumstances of his case, the district court did not err in entering default against the defendant, nor did it abuse its discretion in refusing the defendant relief from that default. A.P. v. Department of Health & Human Servs., Div. of Pub. Assistance & Social Servs., 849 P.2d 703,

1993 Wyo. LEXIS 52

(Wyo. 1993).

Failure to allege facts showing residence. —

See Myuskovich v. State, 59 Wyo. 406, 141 P.2d 540,

1943 Wyo. LEXIS 21

(Wyo. 1943).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Right of nonresident mother to maintain bastardy proceeding, 57 ALR2d 689.

Long-arm statutes: obtaining jurisdiction over nonresident parent in filiation or support proceeding, 76 ALR3d 708.

Death of obligor parent as affecting decree for support of child, 14 ALR5th 557.

§ 14-2-805.
Venue.

Venue for a proceeding to adjudicate parentage is in the county of this state in which:

The child resides or is found;

The respondent resides or is found if the child does not reside in this state; or

A proceeding for probate or administration of the presumed or alleged father’s estate has been commenced.

History.

Laws 2003, ch. 93, § 1.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

§ 14-2-806.
No limitation; child having no presumed, acknowledged or adjudicated father.

A proceeding to adjudicate the parentage of a child having no presumed, acknowledged or adjudicated father may be commenced at any time, even after:

The child becomes an adult but only if the child initiates the proceeding; or

An earlier proceeding to adjudicate paternity has been dismissed based on the application of a statute of limitation then in effect.

History.

Laws 2003, ch. 93, § 1.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it apears in the printed acts.

§ 14-2-807.
Limitation; child having presumed father.

Except as otherwise provided in subsection (b) of this section, a proceeding brought by a presumed father, the mother, or another individual to adjudicate the parentage of a child having a presumed father shall be commenced within a reasonable time after obtaining knowledge of relevant facts, but in no event later than five (5) years after the child’s birth.

A proceeding seeking to disprove the father-child relationship between a child and the child’s presumed father may be maintained at any time if the court determines that:

The presumed father and the mother of the child neither cohabited nor engaged in sexual intercourse with each other during the probable time of conception; and

The presumed father never openly held out the child as his own.

History.

Laws 2003, ch. 93, § 1.

Applicability.—

In a paternity action, while the child at issue had a presumed father, that being the mother’s husband, petitioner, who had relations with the mother as part of the parties open relationship, had standing under Wyo. Stat. Ann. §

14-2-802

to bring a paternity action. This section was a statute of limitations and did not otherwise modify the standing granted in Wyo. Stat. Ann. §

14-2-802

. BJ v. KM, 2021 WY 37, 481 P.3d 1138,

2021 Wyo. LEXIS 44

(Wyo. 2021).

§ 14-2-808.
Authority to deny motion for genetic testing.

In a proceeding to adjudicate the parentage of a child having a presumed father or to challenge the paternity of a child having an acknowledged father, the court may deny a motion seeking an order for genetic testing of the mother, the child and the presumed or acknowledged father if the court determines that:

The conduct of the mother or the presumed or acknowledged father estops that party from denying parentage; and

It would be inequitable to disprove the father-child relationship between the child and the presumed or acknowledged father.

In determining whether to deny a motion seeking an order for genetic testing under this section, the court shall consider the best interest of the child, including the following factors:

The length of time between the proceeding to adjudicate parentage and the time that the presumed or acknowledged father was placed on notice that he might not be the genetic father;

The length of time during which the presumed or acknowledged father has assumed the role of father of the child;

The facts surrounding the presumed or acknowledged father’s discovery of his possible nonpaternity;

The nature of the relationship between the child and the presumed or acknowledged father;

The age of the child;

The harm that may result to the child if presumed or acknowledged paternity is successfully disproved;

The nature of the relationship between the child and any alleged father;

The extent to which the passage of time reduces the chances of establishing the paternity of another man and a child support obligation in favor of the child; and

Other factors that may affect the equities arising from the disruption of the father-child relationship between the child and the presumed or acknowledged father or the chance of other harm to the child.

In a proceeding involving the application of this section, a minor or incapacitated child shall be represented by a guardian ad litem.

Denial of a motion seeking an order for genetic testing shall be based on clear and convincing evidence.

If the court denies a motion seeking an order for genetic testing, it shall issue an order adjudicating the presumed father to be the father of the child.

History.

Laws 2003, ch. 93, § 1.

Presumption that blood, genetic tests necessary rebuttable.—

While blood or genetic tests are presumptively necessary in a paternity action, that presumption may be rebutted. In re SAJ, 781 P.2d 528,

1989 Wyo. LEXIS 216

(Wyo. 1989), (decided under prior law).

§ 14-2-809.
Limitation; child having acknowledged or adjudicated father.

If a child has an acknowledged father, a signatory to the acknowledgment of paternity or denial of paternity may commence a proceeding seeking to rescind the acknowledgement or denial or challenge the paternity of the child only within the time allowed under W.S.

14-2-607

or

14-2-608

.

If a child has an acknowledged father or an adjudicated father, an individual, other than the child, who is neither a signatory to the acknowledgment of paternity nor a party to the adjudication and who seeks an adjudication of paternity of the child shall commence a proceeding not later than two (2) years after the effective date of the acknowledgment or adjudication.

A proceeding under this section is subject to the application of the principles of estoppel established under W.S.

14-2-808

.

History.

Laws 2003, ch. 93, § 1.

§ 14-2-810.
Joinder of proceedings.

Except as otherwise provided in subsection (b) of this section, a proceeding to adjudicate parentage may be joined with a proceeding for adoption, termination of parental rights, child custody or visitation, child support, divorce, annulment, legal separation or separate maintenance, probate or administration of an estate or other appropriate proceeding.

A respondent may not join a proceeding described in subsection (a) of this section with a proceeding to adjudicate parentage brought under the Uniform Interstate Family Support Act.

History.

Laws 2003, ch. 93, § 1.

Cross references. —

For the Uniform Interstate Family Support Act, see §

20-4-139

et seq.

Standing.—

Department of Family Services could not challenge the district court’s order adjudicating petitioner’s paternity where it was not a party to the paternity action, and the joinder of the proceedings did not change the Department’s status as a nonparty in the paternity action. TE v. Dep't of Family Servs. (In re AAAE), 2020 WY 117, 471 P.3d 990,

2020 Wyo. LEXIS 133

(Wyo. 2020).

§ 14-2-811.
Proceeding before birth.

A proceeding to determine parentage may be commenced before the birth of the child, but may not be concluded until after the birth of the child. The following actions may be taken before the birth of the child:

Service of process;

Discovery; and

Except as prohibited by W.S.

14-2-702

, collection of specimens for genetic testing.

History.

Laws 2003, ch. 93, § 1.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it apears in the printed acts.

§ 14-2-812.
Child as party; representation.

A minor child is a permissible party, but is not a necessary party to a proceeding under this article.

The court shall appoint an attorney to represent the best interest of a minor or incapacitated child if the child is a party or the court finds that the interests of the child are not adequately represented.

History.

Laws 2003, ch. 93, § 1.

§ 14-2-813.
Admissibility of results of genetic testing; expenses.

Except as otherwise provided in subsection (c) of this section, a record of a genetic testing expert is admissible as evidence of the truth of the facts asserted in the report unless a party objects to its admission within fourteen (14) days after its receipt by the objecting party and cites specific grounds for exclusion. The admissibility of the report is not affected by whether the testing was performed:

Voluntarily or pursuant to an order of the court or a child support enforcement agency; or

Before or after the commencement of the proceeding.

A party objecting to the results of genetic testing may call one (1) or more genetic testing experts to testify in person or by telephone, videoconference, deposition or another method approved by the court. Unless otherwise ordered by the court, the party offering the testimony bears the expense for the expert testifying.

If a child has a presumed, acknowledged or adjudicated father, the results of genetic testing are inadmissible to adjudicate parentage unless performed:

With the consent of both the mother and the presumed, acknowledged or adjudicated father; or

Pursuant to an order of the court under W.S.

14-2-702

.

Copies of bills for genetic testing and for prenatal and postnatal health care for the mother and child which are furnished to the adverse party not less than ten (10) days before the date of a hearing are admissible to establish:

The amount of the charges billed; and

That the charges were reasonable, necessary and customary.

History.

Laws 2003, ch. 93, § 1.

§ 14-2-814.
Consequences of declining genetic testing.

A person who declines to comply with an order for genetic testing is guilty of contempt of court.

If an individual whose paternity is being determined declines to submit to genetic testing ordered by the court, the court for that reason may adjudicate parentage contrary to the position of that individual.

Genetic testing of the mother of a child is not a condition precedent to testing the child and a man whose paternity is being determined. If the mother is unavailable or declines to submit to genetic testing, the court may order the testing of the child and every man whose paternity is being adjudicated.

History.

Laws 2003, ch. 93, § 1.

§ 14-2-815.
Admission of paternity authorized.

A respondent in a proceeding to adjudicate parentage may admit to the paternity of a child by filing a pleading to that effect or by admitting paternity under penalty of perjury when making an appearance or during a hearing.

If the court finds that the admission of paternity satisfies the requirements of this section and finds that there is no reason to question the admission, the court shall issue an order adjudicating the child to be the child of the man admitting paternity.

History.

Laws 2003, ch. 93, § 1.

§ 14-2-816.
Temporary order.

In a proceeding under this article, the court shall issue a temporary order for support of a child if the order is appropriate and the individual ordered to pay support is:

A presumed father of the child;

Petitioning to have his paternity adjudicated;

Identified as the father through genetic testing under W.S.

14-2-705

;

An alleged father who has declined to submit to genetic testing;

Shown by clear and convincing evidence to be the father of the child; or

The mother of the child.

A temporary order may include provisions for custody and visitation as provided by other law of this state.

History.

Laws 2003, ch. 93, § 1.

§ 14-2-817.
Rules for adjudication of paternity.

The court shall apply the following rules to adjudicate the paternity of a child:

The paternity of a child having a presumed, acknowledged or adjudicated father may be disproved only by admissible results of genetic testing excluding that man as the father of the child or identifying another man as the father of the child;

Unless the results of genetic testing are admitted to rebut other results of genetic testing, a man identified as the father of a child under W.S.

14-2-705

shall be adjudicated the father of the child;

If the court finds that genetic testing under W.S.

14-2-705

neither identifies nor excludes a man as the father of a child, the court may not dismiss the proceeding. In that event, the results of genetic testing, and other evidence, are admissible to adjudicate the issue of paternity;

Unless the results of genetic testing are admitted to rebut other results of genetic testing, a man excluded as the father of a child by genetic testing shall be adjudicated not to be the father of the child.

History.

Laws 2003, ch. 93, § 1.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it apears in the printed acts.

Petition improperly denied.—

District court erred in denying the petition to establish paternity where although it had discretion to determine the timeliness of a paternity petition before ordering testing, the statutes did not afford it discretion on the timeliness of a petition after ordering genetic testing. Specifically, Wyo. Stat. Ann. §

14-2-817

did not afford the court discretion to deny a petition to establish paternity after ordering genetic testing pursuant to Wyo. Stat. Ann. §

14-2-702

, the results of which had met the threshold established by Wyo. Stat. Ann. § 14-2-705(a). TE v. Dep't of Family Servs. (In re AAAE), 2020 WY 117, 471 P.3d 990,

2020 Wyo. LEXIS 133

(Wyo. 2020).

Paternity must be proved by preponderance of evidence.

X v. Y, 482 P.2d 688,

1971 Wyo. LEXIS 206

(Wyo. 1971) (decided under prior law).

§ 14-2-818.
Jury prohibited.

The court, without a jury, shall adjudicate paternity of a child.

History.

Laws 2003, ch. 93, § 1.

§ 14-2-819.
Hearings; inspection of records.

Notwithstanding any other law concerning public hearings and records, any hearing or trial held under this act shall be held in closed court without admittance of any person other than those necessary to the action or proceeding. All papers and records other than the final judgment pertaining to the action or proceeding, whether part of the permanent record of the court or of a file in the state office of vital records services or elsewhere, are subject to inspection only by court order.

History.

Laws 2003, ch. 93, § 1.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in this section, see § 14-2-402(a)(xxi).

Transcripts. —

District court had to ensure that proceedings to establish paternity were reported, so that a transcript of those proceedings would be available in the event of an appeal; there must be a record suitable for the purpose of meaningful review on appeal. JAG v. State, 2002 WY 158, 56 P.3d 1016,

2002 Wyo. LEXIS 179

(Wyo. 2002).

Quoted in

LeBlanc v. State (In re ARLeB), 2017 WY 107, 401 P.3d 932,

2017 Wyo. LEXIS 113

(Wyo. 2017).

§ 14-2-820.
Order on default.

The court shall issue an order adjudicating the paternity of a man who:

After service of process, is in default; and

Is found by the court to be the father of a child.

History.

Laws 2003, ch. 93, § 1.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it apears in the printed acts.

Failure to adhere to procedural requirements. —

Although failure to adhere to the procedural requirements of the statutes governing establishment of paternity of a child receiving aid from the department of family services may cause a judgment rendered under those statutes to be void, where the defendant had notice of the hearing, an opportunity to be heard, and was accorded the process due under all the circumstances of his case, the district court did not err in entering default against the defendant, nor did it abuse its discretion in refusing the defendant relief from that default. A.P. v. Department of Health & Human Servs., Div. of Pub. Assistance & Social Servs., 849 P.2d 703,

1993 Wyo. LEXIS 52

(Wyo. 1993) (decided under prior law).

§ 14-2-821.
Dismissal for want of prosecution.

The court may issue an order dismissing a proceeding commenced under this act for want of prosecution only without prejudice. An order of dismissal for want of prosecution purportedly with prejudice is void and has only the effect of a dismissal without prejudice.

History.

Laws 2003, ch. 93, § 1.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in this section, see § 14-2-402(a)(xxi).

§ 14-2-822.
Order adjudicating parentage.

The court shall issue an order adjudicating whether a man alleged or claiming to be the father is the parent of the child.

An order adjudicating parentage shall identify the child by name and date of birth.

Except as otherwise provided in subsection (d) of this section, the court may assess filing fees, reasonable attorney’s fees, fees for genetic testing, necessary travel and other reasonable expenses incurred in a proceeding under this article. The court may award attorney’s fees, which may be paid directly to the attorney, who may enforce the order in the attorney’s own name.

The court may not assess fees, costs or expenses against the child support enforcement agency of this state or another state, except as provided by other law.

On request of a party and for good cause shown, the court may order that the name of the child be changed.

If the order of the court is at variance with the child’s birth certificate, the court shall order the state office of vital records to issue an amended birth certificate.

Upon a sufficient showing by the department of family services that birth costs were paid by medical assistance within the preceding five (5) years, the court shall include a requirement in an order adjudicating parentage that the father pay birth costs to the department in the manner set forth in W.S.

14-2-1004

. Failure of the department to make a sufficient showing under this subsection shall not preclude the department from subsequently seeking recovery in any other manner authorized by law.

History.

Laws 2003, ch. 93, § 1; 2018 ch. 131, § 2, effective July 1, 2018.

The 2018 amendment,

effective July 1, 2018, added (g).

Cross references. —

As to birth registration generally, see §

35-1-410

.

As to unwed mothers' and fathers' names on birth certificates, see §

35-1-411

.

As to judicial procedure to establish facts of birth where delayed certificate of birth is rejected, see §

35-1-415

.

For new certificate of birth following adoption, legitimation, and parternity determination, see §

35-1-417

.

UIFSA action. —

District court acquired personal jurisdiction over nonresident mother by virtue of her demand for affirmative relief pursuant to Uniform Interstate Family Support Act, and court's jurisdiction extended to ordering visitation for father, changing child's name on birth certificate, and granting father the federal income tax dependency deduction. Ostermiller v. Spurr, 968 P.2d 940,

1998 Wyo. LEXIS 170

(Wyo. 1998) (decided under prior law).

Amount of judgment not excessive. —

Order directing able-bodied man to pay unmarried woman $300 annually until child becomes 16, provided that if defendant is inducted into army, he should pay $200 annually, is not excessive in amount. Myuskovich v. State, 59 Wyo. 406, 141 P.2d 540,

1943 Wyo. LEXIS 21

(Wyo. 1943) (decided under prior law).

§ 14-2-823.
Binding effect of determination of parentage.

Except as otherwise provided in subsection (b) of this section, a determination of parentage is binding on:

All signatories to an acknowledgement or denial of paternity as provided in article 5 of this act; and

All parties to an adjudication by a court acting under circumstances that satisfy the jurisdictional requirements of W.S.

20-4-142

.

A child is not bound by a determination of parentage under this act unless:

The determination was based on an unrescinded acknowledgment of paternity and the acknowledgement is consistent with the results of genetic testing;

The adjudication of parentage was based on a finding consistent with the results of genetic testing and the consistency is declared in the determination or is otherwise shown; or

The child was a party or was represented in the proceeding determining parentage by an attorney representing the child’s best interest.

In a proceeding to dissolve a marriage, the court is deemed to have made an adjudication of the parentage of a child if the court acts under circumstances that satisfy the jurisdictional requirements of W.S.

20-4-142

, and the final order:

Expressly identifies a child as a “child of the marriage,” “issue of the marriage,” or similar words indicating that the husband is the father of the child; or

Provides for support of the child by the husband unless paternity is specifically disclaimed in the order.

Except as otherwise provided in subsection (b) of this section, a determination of parentage may be a defense in a subsequent proceeding seeking to adjudicate parentage by an individual who was not a party to the earlier proceeding.

An adjudication of the paternity of a child issued by a court of this state or by the filing of an acknowledgment of paternity pursuant to W.S.

14-2-605

without the benefit of genetic testing, may be challenged by a party to the adjudication only if post-adjudication genetic testing proves that the adjudicated father is not the biological father of the child pursuant to W.S.

14-2-817

. This section does not apply to any of the following:

A paternity determination made in or by a foreign jurisdiction or a paternity determination which has been made in or by a foreign jurisdiction and registered in this state in accordance with the Uniform Interstate Family Support Act;

A paternity determination based upon a court or administrative order of this state if the order was entered based upon blood or genetic test results which demonstrate that the alleged father was not excluded and that the probability of the alleged father’s paternity was ninety-nine percent (99%) or higher.

A petition for disestablishment of paternity shall be filed:

In the district court in which the paternity order is filed;

In the case of an adjudication as a result of the filing of an acknowledgment of paternity pursuant to W.S.

14-2-605

, notwithstanding any other provision of this chapter, the petition shall be filed within the earlier of two (2) years after the petitioner knew or should have known that the paternity of the child was at issue or as provided in W.S.

14-2-809

(b);

In the case of an adjudication issued by a court of this state, the petition shall be filed only by the mother of the child, the adjudicated father of the child, the child, if the child was a party to the adjudication, or the legal representative of any of these parties. A petition filed by an individual who is not a party to the adjudication shall be filed pursuant to W.S.

14-2-809

. The petition under this paragraph shall be filed no later than two (2) years after the petitioner knew or should have known that the paternity of the child was at issue.

The court shall appoint an attorney to represent the best interests of a child if the court finds that the best interests of the child is not adequately represented. In cases concerning an adjudication of paternity pursuant to subsection (c) of this section, the court shall appoint an attorney to represent the best interests of the child. In determining the best interests of the child, the court shall consider the following factors:

The length of time between the proceeding to adjudicate parentage and the time that the adjudicated father was placed on notice that he might not be the genetic father;

The length of time during which the adjudicated father has assumed the role of the father of the child;

The facts surrounding the adjudicated father’s discovery of his possible nonpaternity;

The nature of the relationship between the child and the adjudicated father;

The age of the child;

The harm that may result to the child if adjudicated paternity is successfully disproved;

The nature of the relationship between the child and any alleged father;

The extent to which the passage of time reduces the chances of establishing the paternity of another man and a child support obligation in favor of the child; and

Other factors that may affect the equities arising from the disruption of the father-child relationship between the child and the adjudicated father or the chance of other harm to the child.

The court may order genetic testing pursuant to article 7 of this chapter.

The court may grant relief on the petition filed in accordance with this section upon a finding by the court of all of the following:

The relief sought is in the best interests of the child pursuant to the factors in this section;

The genetic test upon which the relief is granted was properly conducted;

The adjudicated father has not adopted the child;

The child is not a child whose paternity is governed by article 9 of this chapter;

The adjudicated father did not act to prevent the biological father of the child from asserting his paternal rights with respect to the child.

If the court determines that test results conducted in accordance with W.S.

14-2-703

and

14-2-704

exclude the adjudicated father as the biological father, the court may nonetheless dismiss the action to overcome paternity and affirm the paternity adjudication if:

The adjudicated father requests that paternity be preserved and that the parent-child relationship be continued; or

The court finds that it is in the best interests of the child to preserve paternity. In determining the best interests of the child, the court shall consider all of the factors listed in this section.

If the court finds that the adjudication of paternity should be vacated, in accordance with all of the conditions prescribed, the court shall enter an order which provides all of the following:

That the disestablishment of paternity is in the best interests of the child pursuant to the factors in this section;

That the adjudicated father is not the biological father of the child;

That the adjudicated father’s parental rights and responsibilities are terminated as of the date of the filing of the order;

That the birth records agency shall amend the child’s birth certificate by removing the adjudicated father’s name, if it appears thereon, and issue a new birth certificate for the child;

That the adjudicated father is relieved of any and all future support obligations owed on behalf of the child from the date that the order determining that the established father is not the biological father is filed;

That any unpaid support due prior to the date the order determining that the adjudicated father is not the biological father is filed, is due and owing;

That the adjudicated father has no right to reimbursement of past child support paid to the mother, the state of Wyoming or any other assignee of child support.

Participation of the Title IV-D agency in an action brought under this section shall be limited as follows:

The Title IV-D agency shall only participate in actions if services are being provided by the Title IV-D agency pursuant to title 20 chapter 6 of the Wyoming Statutes;

When services are being provided by the Title IV-D agency under title 20 chapter 6 of the Wyoming Statutes, the Title IV-D agency may assist in obtaining genetic tests pursuant to article 7 of this chapter;

An attorney acting on behalf of the Title IV-D agency represents the state of Wyoming in any action under this section. The Title IV-D agency’s attorney is not the legal representative of the mother, the adjudicated father or the child in any action brought under this section.

The costs of genetic testing, the fee of any guardian ad litem and all court costs shall be paid by the person bringing the action to overcome paternity unless otherwise provided by law.

A man presumed to be the father of a child without adjudication of paternity may bring a proceeding to adjudicate paternity pursuant to W.S.

14-2-807

.

History.

Laws 2003, ch. 93, § 1; 2005, ch. 118, § 1.

Cross references. —

As to the Uniform Interstate Family Support Act, see Title 20, Chapter 4.

The 2005 amendment,

effective July 1, 2005, rewrote (e), which formerly read “A party to an adjudication of paternity may challenge the adjudication only under the laws of this state relating to appeal, vacation of judgments or other judicial review”; and added (f) through (p).

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (i) or (l) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

Title IV-D, referred to in subsection (n), is Title IV-D of the Social Security Act, codified as 42 U.S.C.S. § 651 et seq.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in this section, see § 14-2-402(a)(xxi).